Missouri, session 2026, SB949.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 575, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 575.340, to read as
follows:
575.340. 1. A person commits the offense of judicial
malfeasance if the person, while performing the duties of a
judge in this state, releases an individual who is a prior
offender or a persistent offender during the pendency of a
criminal trial and such individual commits a felony during
such release.
2. The offense of judicial malfeasance shall be a
class E felony.
3. Any person charged or convicted with the offense of
judicial malfeasance shall be referred to the commission on
retirement, removal, and discipline for disqualification
from acting as a judicial officer. Any person who pleads
guilty or no contest to or is found guilty of the offense of
judicial malfeasance shall be referred to the commission on
retirement, removal, and discipline for removal and
suspension by the Missouri supreme court.

SB 949 2
4. The terms "prior offender" and "persistent
offender" shall have the same meaning as such terms in
section 558.016.
✓